Washington statutes.
RCW 18.64.265

Schedule II controlled substance—Partial fill permitted.

A pharmacist may partially fill a prescription for a Schedule II controlled substance, if the partial fill is requested by the patient or the prescribing practitioner and the total quantity dispensed in all partial fillings does not exceed the quantity prescribed.

[ 2019 c 314 s 7.]

NOTES:

Declaration—2019 c 314: See note following RCW 18.22.810.